Illinois, session 104th, SB3487.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 5changing Section 6.26 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 85/6.26)7    Sec. 6.26. Immunization against influenza virus and 8pneumococcal disease.9    (a) Every hospital shall adopt an influenza and 10pneumococcal immunization policy that includes, but need not 11be limited to, the following:12        (1) Procedures for identifying patients eligible age 13    50 or older for influenza and immunization and 65 or older 14    for pneumococcal immunization and, at the discretion of 15    the facility, other patients at risk.16        (2) Procedures for offering immunization against 17    influenza virus when available between September 1 and 18    April 1 of the subsequent year, or as indicated by the 19    Department if the flu season varies significantly from 20    those dates, and against pneumococcal disease upon 21    admission or discharge, to patients in accordance with the 22    recommendations of the State Guidelines for Communicable 23    Disease Prevention issued by the Director of Public Health   SB3487 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16787 BAB 30196 b1    pursuant to Section 1.2 of the Communicable Disease 2    Prevention Act or the Advisory Committee on Immunization 3    Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and 4    Prevention that are most recent to the time of 5    vaccination, unless contraindicated.6        (3) Procedures for ensuring that patients offered 7    immunization, or their guardians, receive information 8    regarding the risks and benefits of vaccination.9    The hospital shall provide a copy of its influenza and 10pneumococcal immunization policy to the Department upon 11request.12    If the State Guidelines for Communicable Disease 13Prevention and the guidance from the Advisory Committee on 14Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and 15Prevention are in conflict, the State Guidelines for 16Communicable Disease Prevention shall control where the 17applicable guidance from the Advisory Committee on 18Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and 19Prevention significantly deviates from evidence-based 20immunization practices established by credible scientific and 21medical communities, experts, and practitioners. 22    (b) A home rule unit may not regulate immunization against 23influenza virus and pneumococcal disease in a manner 24inconsistent with the regulation of such immunizations under 25this Section. This subsection is a limitation under subsection 26(i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on   SB3487 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16787 BAB 30196 b1the concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and 2functions exercised by the State.3(Source: P.A. 103-57, eff. 1-1-24.)